North Carolina, session 2025, SB610.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
*S610-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Mecklenburg County for the repair and
improvement of various orphan roads in non-municipal areas of the County, which would allow
the North Carolina Department of Transportation to accept these roads for State maintenance.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 136-102.6, the Department of Transportation
shall make all necessary improvements to Grand Palisades Parkway in accordance with the
minimum standards of the Board of Transportation for acceptance of a subdivision street, after
which the Department shall accept Grand Palisades Parkway to the State highway system for
maintenance.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to make the improvements required in Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 610-First Edition